Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-508
County board; adopt rules and regulations.

The county board is hereby directed to adopt such rules and regulations governing all officers and other persons in the payment, redemption, cancellation and destruction of such warrants, orders, certificates and audited accounts as it deems necessary and sufficient to protect the interests of the county in furtherance of the provisions of sections 10-501 to 10-509.

Laws 1879, § 139, p. 389;

R.S.1913, § 423;

C.S.1922, § 340;

C.S.1929, § 11-508;

R.S.1943, § 10-508.